Nebraska, session 109, LB620.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Neighborhood Revitalization Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Neighborhood Revitalization Act:
(1) Abate or abatement, in connection with any building, means the
removal or correction of any conditions that constitute a public nuisance
and the making of any other improvements that are needed to effect such a
rehabilitation of the building as is consistent with maintaining safe and
habitable conditions over the building's remaining useful life;
(2) Acceptable petitioner means:
(a) Any nonprofit corporation;
(b) The municipal corporation within which such subject parcel is
located;
(c) The owner or legal occupant of a parcel of real property that is
adversely impacted by the condition of the subject parcel; or
(d) Any interested person;
(3) Building means any building or structure that is located on the
subject parcel;
(4) Certified person means any person determined by the court
pursuant to section 8 of this act to be qualified as a receiver or a
qualified buyer;
(5) Dwelling unit means a building or the part of a building that is
intended to be used as a home, residence, or sleeping place;
(6) Governmental authority means any court or governmental,
administrative, legislative, regulatory, adjudicatory, or arbitrational
body, agency, commission, department, board, bureau, tribunal, or
instrumentality of the United States or of any state, commonwealth,
nation, territory, possession, county, or municipality, whether now or
hereafter constituted or existing, having or claiming jurisdiction over
the subject parcel;
(7) Interested person means, with respect to a subject parcel, any
owner, named trustee, or other person that:
-2-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
(a) Holds, or is the assignee of the holder of, a lien against that
subject parcel;
(b) Is named as a nominee or agent of the holder of an obligation
that is secured by a deed or a deed of trust affecting such subject
parcel;
(c) Holds the benefit of an easement appurtenant to such subject
parcel;
(d) Holds the benefit of a restrictive real covenant against such
subject parcel; or
(e) Possesses an interest of record in or to such subject parcel;
(8) Municipal corporation means any county, township, city, or
village of this state, whether organized and existing under direct
provisions of the Constitution of Nebraska or statutes of this state, or
by virtue of charters or other corporate articles or instruments executed
under authority of the Constitution of Nebraska or statutes of this
state;
(9) Nonprofit corporation means any nonprofit corporation that has
been duly organized and is in good standing under the laws of this state;
(10) Owner means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom
is vested all or part of the legal title to, or beneficial ownership of,
the subject parcel;
(11) Person means any individual, firm, corporation, association,
trust, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company,
governmental authority, or other entity;
(12) Public nuisance means any building that is:
(a) A menace to the public health, welfare, or safety;
(b) Structurally unsafe, unsanitary, or not provided with adequate
safe egress;
(c) A fire hazard, dangerous to human life, or no longer fit and
habitable;
(d) Otherwise determined by the court or a municipal corporation to
-3-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
be a violation of any local building, housing, air pollution, sanitation,
health, fire, zoning, or safety code, ordinance, or regulation applicable
to any subject parcel;
(13) Qualified buyer means any person determined by the court to be
a certified person as provided in section 8 of this act;
(14) Receiver means any certified person appointed by the court for
the purpose of preserving or improving the subject parcel;
(15) Receiver's lien means a first priority lien in favor of the
receiver against the subject parcel that, with regard to the subject
parcel, upon approval of the court, secures:
(a) Any and all reasonable expenses and costs incurred by the
receiver, including reasonable attorney's fees and costs; and
(b) A fee, payable to the receiver, equal to ten percent of the
total of the amounts provided under subdivision (15)(a) of this section,
but in no event less than two thousand five hundred dollars;
(16) Residential property means a subject parcel that includes one
or more dwelling units that is owner-occupied and the owner's principal
place of residence, or that is otherwise intended for single-family
residential use;
(17) Residential rental property means a building or structure
consisting of one or two dwelling units;
(18) Stabilization, with regard to a building, means the removal or
correction of any conditions that are designed to secure, protect
against, or prevent further deterioration of such building; and
(19) Subject parcel means a tract or item of real or personal
property that becomes subject to the jurisdiction of a court pursuant to
the Neighborhood Revitalization Act.
Sec. 3. (1) The owner of residential rental property or residential
property shall be required to maintain the exterior of such property and
the lot on which the residential rental property or residential property
is located at a level which is no less than the community standards of
-4-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
the residential property in the area.
(2) It is prima facie evidence that the residential rental property
or residential property is not maintained at the community standards of
the residential property in the area if the owner of such residential
rental property or residential property has been cited for three or more
separate violations of local building and construction codes or property
standards governing residential property within a one-year period and the
owner has not brought the property into compliance with such building and
construction codes or property standards within such period.
Sec. 4. (1) An owner of residential property affected by
residential rental property or residential property not maintained to
community standards of residential property in the area may bring an
action for damages against the owner of such residential rental property
or residential property for failure to maintain the property in the
manner required by section 3 of this act; provided, however, that a
showing by the owner of the residential rental property or residential
property that the failure to maintain the property is due to an act of
nature, serious illness, or a legal barrier shall constitute a defense to
any cause of action brought under this section.
(2) The measure of damages shall be the difference between the value
of the owner's residential property if the residential rental property or
residential property were maintained at the community standards of the
residential property in the area and the value of the owner's residential
property because the residential rental property or residential property
is not maintained at such community standards.
(3) As proof of the value of the owner's residential property, the
plaintiff shall submit to the court two independent appraisals.
(4) Upon a finding by the court that an owner of residential rental
property or residential property has failed to maintain the property in
the manner required by section 3 of this act, the court may award the
person bringing an action under this section reasonable attorney's fees
-5-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
and costs.
Sec. 5. The Neighborhood Revitalization Act shall apply in any
county, township, city, or village of this state, whether organized and
existing under direct provisions of the Constitution of Nebraska or
statutes of this state, or by virtue of charters or other corporate
articles or instruments executed under the authority of the Constitution
of Nebraska or statutes of this state.
Sec. 6. (1) An acceptable petitioner may file a petition for a
judgment in rem against a subject parcel, naming the subject parcel as
the defendant and seeking an order that the subject parcel is a public
nuisance and for the abatement of the public nuisance. A proceeding
pursuant to this section shall be a proceeding in rem. If the applicable
municipal corporation is not the acceptable petitioner, then the
applicable municipal corporation shall be put on notice of the in rem
proceeding and provided with a full copy of the petition as filed by the
acceptable petitioner. If the acceptable petitioner has not attached a
certificate of public nuisance to the petition, the municipal corporation
shall complete an inspection of the subject parcel within thirty calendar
days after the first setting of the matter in court, and the court shall
promptly schedule a hearing on the issue of public nuisance. At the
conclusion of the hearing on the issue of public nuisance, the court
shall determine whether or not the issuance of a certificate of public
nuisance is warranted. The court shall dismiss the action if the subject
parcel is found not to be a public nuisance by the court.
(2) The petition filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
must include a draft order of compliance setting forth the relief
requested as described in this section and shall specifically request the
appointment of a receiver if an order of compliance pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section is entered and if the owner fails to
comply with such order.
(3) The filing of a petition for a judgment in rem pursuant to
-6-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Create a receiver's lien that secures an undetermined amount
until the court establishes the amount. The receiver's lien shall be a
first lien on the subject parcel, which is superior to all prior and
subsequent liens or other encumbrances associated with the subject parcel
except for the lien for general property taxes as described in section
77-203. The acceptable petitioner shall file for record in the register's
office of the county a notice certified by the clerk, within one day of
certification by the clerk, containing the names of the parties to the
suit, a statement that a petition has been filed pursuant to this
section, a description of the subject parcel and its ownership, and a
brief statement of the nature and amount of the lien sought to be
imposed, which filing shall act as a lien lis pendens against the subject
parcel. The outstanding principal amount of the receiver's lien carries
interest at a standard statutory rate applicable to property tax liens as
provided in section 77-207;
(b) Act as a bar of any transfer of title of the subject parcel or
of any interests pertaining to such subject parcel, including, but not
limited to, transfers by foreclosure, transfers or creation of lien
interests in the subject parcel, or otherwise, from the date of the
filing until the petition is dismissed or until specific orders of the
court authorizing a transfer of title, if the petition has attached a
certificate of public nuisance issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section; and
(c) Authorize the municipal corporation, in its discretion, to
access the subject parcel for securing and maintaining the subject parcel
at any time if it has been determined by the court that the owner has
failed to do so. Any costs incurred by the municipal corporation shall be
charged to the owner.
(4) Notice of a petition for a judgment in rem filed pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section shall, at a minimum, be provided to each
-7-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
owner and interested person identified by a thorough title search and
examination of the subject parcel, including a search of court records of
the county where the subject parcel is located. The petitioner shall file
with the court a certification that notice has been provided pursuant to
this subsection. Notice shall be provided by:
(a) Service of the petition by any method for service of summons as
provided by section 25-505.01;
(b) Posting a copy of the petition in a conspicuous place on the
building;
(c) Publication of the petition in a newspaper of general
circulation published in the county where the subject parcel is located;
and
(d) Sending a copy of the petition by first-class mail addressed to
"occupant" at the subject parcel.
(5) If, after a hearing, the subject parcel is found to be a public
nuisance, the court shall issue an order of compliance requiring the
owner of the subject parcel to produce a plan for the abatement of the
public nuisance. The acceptable petitioner shall file such order in the
register's office of the county where the subject parcel is located. The
plan must comply with subdivision (8)(a) of this section and must be
approved by the court. If the owner has commenced work on the subject
parcel prior to or during the pendency of the action, the owner is
required to provide a report of the work that has been completed to date,
as well as a plan for the abatement of the public nuisance. Once a plan
is approved by the court, the municipal corporation shall provide
periodic updates to the court on the owner's progress towards completion
of the plan and other relevant information about the subject parcel and
surrounding area. Upon a finding by the court that the subject parcel is
a public nuisance, the court may award all reasonable attorney's fees and
costs to the person filing the petition for a judgment in rem.
(6) If the owner fails to comply with the court's order of
-8-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
compliance pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the court may
allow an interested person the opportunity to undertake the work to abate
the public nuisance pursuant to a plan that complies with subdivision (8)
(a) of this section submitted by such interested person.
(7) If the actions pursuant to subsections (5) and (6) of this
section fail to abate the public nuisance, then the court may appoint a
receiver to take possession and control of the subject parcel in order to
execute a plan submitted by such receiver that complies with either
subdivision (8)(a) or (8)(b) of this section. A receiver appointed
pursuant to the Neighborhood Revitalization Act is not personally liable
for actions taken pursuant to the receivership except for misfeasance,
malfeasance, or nonfeasance in the performance of the functions of the
office.
(8)(a) A public nuisance abatement plan, if submitted by an owner,
interested party, or proposed receiver, must provide the following in
writing:
(i) A detailed budget for abating the public nuisance;
(ii) A projected timeline for abating the public nuisance;
(iii) If repair and rehabilitation of the subject parcel are found
not to be feasible, the cost of demolition of the subject parcel or of
the portions of the subject parcel that constitute the public nuisance;
and
(iv) The terms, conditions, and availability of any financing that
is necessary to abate the public nuisance or a show of sufficient assets.
(b) A stabilization plan, if submitted by a proposed receiver, must
provide the following in writing:
(i) A detailed budget for stabilizing the subject parcel;
(ii) A projected timeline for stabilizing the subject parcel; and
(iii) The terms, conditions, and availability of any financing that
is necessary to stabilize the subject parcel or a show of sufficient
assets.
-9-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
(9)(a) If the court deems a plan submitted by a receiver to be
sufficient and appropriate, the court may empower the receiver to:
(i) Take possession and control of the subject parcel;
(ii) Pay all expenses of operating and conserving the subject
parcel, including obtaining property insurance;
(iii) Pay pre-receivership mortgages or installments of such
mortgages and other liens;
(iv) Pay all outstanding municipal fines, penalties, expenditures,
and assessments and all amounts attributable to state and local taxes and
assessments, including all outstanding amounts secured by delinquent
property tax liens; provided, that, within thirty days of being
appointed, a receiver is required to fully satisfy all outstanding
amounts secured by delinquent property tax liens; and
(v) Implement the plan; provided, that, if the plan requires
demolition, the court shall order that the demolition be done properly
and in compliance with applicable laws.
(b) The receiver shall file a report with the court every sixty
calendar days and, upon completion of work pursuant to the receiver's
approved plan, shall file a final report with the court and move for the
establishment of the amount of the receiver's lien. If the court finds
that work pursuant to the receiver's approved plan has been completed,
then the court shall establish the amount of the receiver's lien and put
the owner on notice that the owner has thirty days from such finding to
satisfy the receiver's lien in full. If the owner satisfies the
receiver's lien in full during such time, then the receivership shall be
terminated by order of the court. An owner or interested party that
satisfies a receiver's lien established pursuant to a receiver's
completion of a stabilization plan pursuant to subdivision (8)(b) of this
section shall submit and complete a public nuisance abatement plan
pursuant to subdivision (8)(a) of this section.
(10) If the receiver's lien is not satisfied by the owner pursuant
-10-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
to subdivision (9)(b) of this section, the court shall direct the
receiver to offer the subject parcel for sale at auction in accordance
with the following:
(a) The sales procedure shall follow the procedures provided in
section 25-1516;
(b) The minimum bid at a receiver's auction must be the full amount
of the receiver's lien;
(c) If the receiver has completed work pursuant to an approved
stabilization plan authorized by subdivision (8)(b) of this section, then
only bidders who have been certified by the court as qualified buyers may
bid at the receiver's auction. The terms of the auction must include the
requirement of a bond or other security, in an amount fixed by the court,
ensuring abatement of the public nuisance within nine months of the date
of the closing of the sale to the qualified buyer. If a qualified buyer
prevails at such an auction and the qualified buyer's bid is approved by
the court, then the receiver's plan pursuant to subdivision (8)(b) of
this section must be amended by the court to include supervision of the
qualified buyer and reports to the court of the qualified buyer's
progress until the abatement of the public nuisance is completed, at
which time the receivership must be terminated by order of the court
after a hearing on the receiver's motion for termination of the
receivership;
(d) If there is no bid at the receiver's auction for greater than
the minimum bid, the subject parcel shall be transferred by receiver's
deed to the receiver, and there shall be no requirement of cash payment
of the minimum bid by the receiver;
(e) When the successful bid is paid in cash, the amount of the
minimum bid must be paid to satisfy the receiver's lien. Any surplus
shall be distributed, as approved by the court, to the owner and
interested persons in the priority in which their interests encumbered
the subject parcel prior to the auction; and
-11-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
(f) The receiver shall report the prevailing bid at the sale to the
court, and upon approval by the court, a receiver's deed shall be issued
to the successful bidder and promptly recorded in the office of the
register of deeds. Title shall be absolute in the purchaser, and the
interests of any interested persons prior to the auction shall be
terminated as of the date of the auction. Except as provided in
subdivision (10)(c) of this section, the receivership shall be terminated
after the auction by order of the court after a hearing on the receiver's
motion for termination of the receivership.
(11)(a) Nothing in the Neighborhood Revitalization Act limits the
powers granted to a court having jurisdiction pursuant to section 7 of
this act.
(b) A judge in a civil action described in subsection (1) of this
section, or the judge's successor in office, has continuing jurisdiction
to review and order correction of the condition of any subject parcel
that was determined to be a public nuisance pursuant to the Neighborhood
Revitalization Act.
Sec. 7. Jurisdiction for civil actions filed pursuant to the
Neighborhood Revitalization Act is conferred upon the district court
where the rental or residential property lies.
Sec. 8. (1) Any person seeking to be qualified as a certified
person shall make application to the applicable court in the county in
which such person seeks to serve, on such form and according to such
standards and procedures as such court reasonably may require, including
the following, which the court may require to be brought current at any
time, as applicable:
(a) An external verification of good standing;
(b) The articles of incorporation and bylaws or formation documents;
(c) Evidence of financial capacity to carry out an abatement plan,
including audited financial statements of the person for the past five
years, where applicable;
-12-

LB620 LB620
2025 2025
(d) A formal conflict of interest policy governing the staff,
officers, and the board of directors, if applicable;
(e) Evidence of the administrative capacity to successfully
undertake the abatement plan; and
(f) Any other documents, evidence, or assurances that the court may
require.
(2) Any local land bank formed pursuant to the Nebraska Municipal
Land Bank Act is a certified person for all purposes under the
Neighborhood Revitalization Act. In the court's discretion, an acceptable
petitioner may also be qualified as a certified person who is appointed
as a receiver.
Sec. 9. The receiver may be discharged at any time in the
discretion of the court. The receiver shall be discharged when all of the
following have occurred:
(1) The public nuisance has been abated; and
(2) The costs of the receivership have been paid.
Sec. 10. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
-13-